Utah statutes.
48-1d-703.   Effect of dissociation.

(1)  If a person's dissociation results in a dissolution and winding up of the partnership's activities and affairs, Part 9, Dissolution and Winding Up, applies, otherwise, Part 8, Partner's Dissociation When Business Not Wound Up, applies.

(2)  If a person is dissociated as a partner:

(a)  the person's right to participate in the management and conduct of the partnership's activities and affairs terminates, except as otherwise provided in Subsection 48-1d-902(3); and

(b)  the person's duties and obligations under Section 48-1d-405:

(i)  end with regard to matters arising and events occurring after the person's dissociation; and

(ii)  continue only with regard to matters arising and events occurring before the person's dissociation, unless the partner participates in winding up the partnership's activities and affairs pursuant to Section 48-1d-902.

(3)  A person's dissociation does not of itself discharge the person from a debt, obligation, or other liability to the partnership or the other partners which the person incurred while a partner.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

